dev/apertium-swe.pre-saldo-swe.dix
<pardef n="n/ysa__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ysa</l>       <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yser</l>      <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yses</l>      <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yste</l>      <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e r="LR" a="PT">       <p><l>ös</l>        <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yst</l>       <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ys</l>        <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ysande</l>    <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hys/a__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ande</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ta</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bel/ysa__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ysa</l>         <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yser</l>        <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yses</l>        <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yste</l>        <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e r="LR" a="PT">       <p><l>ös</l>        <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yst</l>         <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ys</l>          <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ysande</l>      <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yst</l>         <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yst</l>         <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ysta</l>        <r>ysa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="avbr/yta__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>yta</l>       <r>yta<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yter</l>      <r>yta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ytes</l>      <r>yta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öt</l>        <r>yta<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>utit</l>      <r>yta<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yt</l>        <r>yta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ytande</l>    <r>yta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uten</l>      <r>yta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>utet</l>      <r>yta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>utna</l>      <r>yta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kl/yva__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>yva</l>       <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yver</l>      <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yvs</l>       <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öv</l>        <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yde</l>       <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uvit</l>      <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yvt</l>       <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yv</l>        <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yvande</l>    <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uven</l>      <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uvet</l>      <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uvna</l>      <r>yva<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="best/å__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>å</l>         <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>år</l>        <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ås</l>        <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>od</l>        <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ått</l>       <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>å</l>         <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ående</l>     <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ådd</l>       <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ått</l>       <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ådda</l>      <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="st/å__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>å</l>         <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>år</l>        <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ås</l>        <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>od</l>        <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>og</l>        <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ått</l>       <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>å</l>         <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ående</l>     <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ånden</l>     <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åndet</l>     <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åndna</l>     <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="stå">             <i>st</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bestå">           <i>best</i><par n="best/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="förstå">          <i>först</i><par n="best/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="missförstå">      <i>missförst</i><par n="best/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="avbryta">         <i>avbr</i><par n="avbr/yta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="belysa" a="PT">          <i>belys</i><par n="bel/ysa__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bryta">           <i>br</i><par n="avbr/yta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hysa">            <i>hys</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="inhysa" a="PT">            <i>inhys</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="avhysa" a="PT">            <i>avhys</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="klyva">           <i>kl</i><par n="kl/yva__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nysa">            <i>n</i><par n="n/ysa__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skryta">          <i>skr</i><par n="avbr/yta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trycka">          <i>tryck</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tycka">           <i>tyck</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="utmärka" a="is">  <i>utmärk</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bistå" a="is">    <i>bist</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="framstå" a="is">  <i>framst</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="avstå" a="is">    <i>avst</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="misstänka" a="is"><i>misstänk</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sköta" a="is">    <i>sköt</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kvarstå" a="is">  <i>kvarst</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="besöka" a="is">   <i>besök</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hjälpa" a="is">   <i>hjälp</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="knyta" a="is">    <i>kn</i><par n="avbr/yta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="uppstå" a="is">   <i>uppst</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="avhjälpa" a="is"> <i>avhjälp</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="utsträcka" a="is"><i>utsträck</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lösa" a="is">     <i>lös</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="märka" a="is">    <i>märk</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mäta" a="is">     <i>mät</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="möta" a="is">     <i>möt</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="undersöka" a="is"><i>undersök</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="försöka" a="is">  <i>försök</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="framväxa" a="is"> <i>framväx</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="samtycka" a="is"> <i>samtyck</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="utbyta" a="is">   <i>utb</i><par n="avbr/yta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sänka" a="is">    <i>sänk</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="släppa" a="is">   <i>släpp</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="förstärka" a="is"><i>förstärk</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stärka" a="is">   <i>stärk</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bemöta" a="is">   <i>bemöt</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ansöka" a="is">   <i>ansök</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="söka" a="is">     <i>sök</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="påstå" a="is">    <i>påst</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="inskränka" a="is"><i>inskränk</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sträcka" a="is">  <i>sträck</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="upptäcka" a="is"> <i>upptäck</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="upplysa" a="PT">  <i>upplys</i><par n="bel/ysa__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kränka" a="is">   <i>kränk</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="växa" a="is">     <i>väx</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="väcka" a="is">    <i>väck</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="återstå" a="is">  <i>återst</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="byta" a="is">     <i>b</i><par n="avbr/yta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="uttrycka" a="is"> <i>uttryck</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="täcka" a="is">    <i>täck</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="utstå" a="is">    <i>utst</i><par n="st/å__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stöta" a="is">    <i>stöt</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ösa" a="is">      <i>ös</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="undertrycka" a="is"><i>undertryck</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="flyta" a="is">    <i>fl</i><par n="avbr/yta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="utbryta" a="is">  <i>utbr</i><par n="avbr/yta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fräsa" a="is">    <i>fräs</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rycka" a="is">    <i>ryck</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kyssa" a="is">    <i>kyss</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mysa" a="PT">     <i>m</i><par n="n/ysa__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="låsa" a="is">     <i>lås</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rysa" a="PT">     <i>r</i><par n="n/ysa__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="döpa" a="is">     <i>döp</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spräcka" a="is">  <i>spräck</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="förtrycka" a="is"><i>förtryck</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="räcka" a="PT">              <i>räck</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="resa" a="PT">              <i>res</i><par n="hys/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lysa" a="PT">              <i>l</i><par n="bel/ysa__vblex"/></e>
